Massachusetts, session 194th, HD6250.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 16 of chapter 126 of the General Laws, is hereby amended by adding the
following sentence:- "The regional lockup, operated by the sheriff of the county of Dukes, shall
be considered part of the jail."
of 1